Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Early Childhood Services

200.700.
Early Childhood Advisory Council — Membership — Meetings.

The Early Childhood Advisory Council is established as a public agency and political subdivision of the Commonwealth with all powers, duties, and responsibilities conferred upon it by statute and essential to perform its functions including but not limited to employing other persons, consultants, attorneys, and agents. The council shall be attached to the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet for administrative purposes and shall establish necessary advisory councils. The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet or the secretary’s designee shall be the appointing authority for the council pursuant to KRS Chapter 18A. The council shall have the ability to make expenditures from the early childhood development fund and shall ensure that expenditures made from the early childhood development fund are in conformance with its duties as established by the General Assembly.

The council shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 12.040. The executive director shall report to the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet or the secretary’s designee.

The council shall consist of the following twenty-six (26) members:

The state director of Head Start Collaboration;

The secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet or designee;

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or designee;

One (1) nonvoting ex officio member from the House of Representatives who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Speaker of the House;

One (1) nonvoting ex officio member from the Senate who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the President of the Senate;

Six (6) private sector members knowledgeable about the health, mental health, education, and development of prenatal to school entry children who shall be appointed by the Governor. One (1) private sector member shall be appointed from each congressional district;

Seven (7) citizens at large of the Commonwealth who shall be appointed by the Governor;

One (1) early childhood development advocate who shall be appointed by the Governor;

One (1) member representing higher education with expertise in early childhood who shall be appointed by the Governor; and

Six (6) members appointed by the Governor, including one (1) member from a Head Start program located in the state, one (1) member from a local education agency, one (1) member from the state agency responsible for education, one (1) member from the state agency responsible for child care, one (1) member from the state agency responsible for Part C of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), and one (1) member from the state agency for health and mental health.

The initial terms of the private sector and citizen-at-large members of the council shall be for:
(4) (a)

The initial terms of the private sector and citizen-at-large members of the council shall be for:

One (1) year for five (5) of the initial terms;

Two (2) years for five (5) of the initial terms;

Three (3) years for six (6) of the initial terms; and

Four (4) years for five (5) of the initial appointments.

All succeeding appointments shall be for four (4) years from the expiration date of the preceding appointment. The private and citizen-at-large members shall serve no more than two (2) full successive terms. A term shall expire on June 30 in the appropriate year.

Members shall serve until a successor has been appointed. If a vacancy on the council occurs, the Governor shall appoint a replacement for the remainder of the unexpired term except for the members appointed by the Speaker of the House and President of the Senate.

The members and nonmember appointees of the council shall comply with the gift and conflict of interest statutes in KRS Chapter 11A. Any conflict of interest issue shall be submitted to the Executive Branch Ethics Commission for resolution.

The Governor shall appoint the chair of the council from the private sector or citizen-at-large membership.

The chair may appoint nonmembers of the council to committees or workgroups.

Private sector and citizen-at-large members and nonmembers appointed to a committee or workgroup shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses in accordance with state travel expenses and reimbursement administrative regulations.

In making appointments to the council, the Governor shall assure broad geographical, ethnic, and gender diversity representation from the major sectors of Kentucky’s early childhood development community. In filling vacancies, the Governor shall attempt to assure the continuing representation on the council of broad constituencies of Kentucky’s early childhood development community.

The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon call of the chair or a majority of the council.

Members of the council shall serve on a voluntary basis and be reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with state travel expense and reimbursement administrative regulations.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 49, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 119, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 61, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 57, § 6, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 99, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

200.703.
Duties of Early Childhood Advisory Council — Implementation of programs — Plan for identification of early childhood development funding priorities — Disbanding or suspension of councils — Expiration of authority, councils, and initiatives — Requests for proposals.

The Early Childhood Advisory Council is responsible for the following:

Promoting the vision for Kentucky’s early childhood system;

Advocating for improved quality of early childhood services;

Promoting the definition of school readiness and the expanded and appropriate use of the early childhood standards;

Strengthening state, regional, and local level coordination and collaboration among the various sectors and settings of early childhood programs in the state;

Identifying opportunities and strategies to reduce barriers to coordination and collaboration among existing private, federal, and state-funded early childhood programs;

Developing and implementing recommendations for:

Increasing overall participation of children in existing federal, state, and local child care and early education programs, including outreach to underrepresented and special populations;

Establishing or improving core elements of the state early childhood system;

Enhancing the professional development system and career ladder for early childhood educators and caregivers; and

Promoting high-quality state early learning standards and undertaking efforts to ensure the development and use of high-quality comprehensive early learning standards, as appropriate;

Assessing the capacity and effectiveness of institutes of higher education in the state toward supporting the development of early childhood educators;

Facilitating the development or enhancement of high-quality systems of early childhood care and education designed to improve school readiness through one (1) or more of the following activities:

Promoting school preparedness of children from birth through school entry;

Supporting professional development, recruitment, and retention initiatives for early childhood educators and caregivers;

Enhancing existing early childhood education and development programs and services;

Carrying out other activities consistent with the state’s plan and application; and

Establishing priorities for programs and the expenditure of funds that include but are not limited to the following:

Implementation of public health initiatives identified by the General Assembly, including those listed in KRS 211.690 and 199.8945;

Provision of preconception and prenatal vitamins, with priority for folic acid for the prevention of neural tube defects;

Voluntary immunization for children not covered by public or private health insurance;

Expanding availability of high-quality, affordable early child-care and education options; and

Increasing public awareness of the importance of the early childhood years for the well-being of all of Kentucky’s citizens;

Requesting reports and issuing progress updates on state and federally funded services that impact the quality of Kentucky’s early childhood system;

Receiving, requesting, and utilizing, consistent with this section, federal, state, and private funds, including from philanthropic sources;

Involving the corporate community, county judge/executives, and mayors in supporting issues of importance to working families with young children in the Commonwealth;

Collecting and disseminating information about the various ways business and local government can become involved in supporting early childhood; and

Other duties and responsibilities as designated by the Governor.

The council shall develop a state plan on a biennial basis that identifies early childhood development funding priorities. Every two (2) years the council shall review its priorities and make necessary adjustments to its state plan. The state plan shall incorporate priorities included in the final report and recommendations of the Governor’s Task Force on Early Childhood Development and Education, November 2010, and recommendations identified by the community early childhood councils. The council shall file a report on the state plan with the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission by July 15 of odd-numbered years.

Programs funded by the council shall be implemented by the appropriate agencies within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or other appropriate administrative agency.

The council shall assure that a public hearing is held on the expenditure of funds. Advertisement of the public hearing shall be published at least once but may be published two (2) more times, if one (1) publication occurs not less than seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21) days before the scheduled date of the public hearing.

The council shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:

Coordinate and improve early childhood development services, outcomes, and policies;

Establish procedures that relate to its governance;

Designate service areas of the Commonwealth where the community early childhood councils may be established to identify and address the early childhood development needs of young children and their families for the communities that they serve;

Establish procedures that relate to the monitoring of grants, services, and activities of the community early childhood councils and their governance;

Establish procedures for accountability and measurement of the success of programs that receive funds from the council; and

Establish standards for the payment of funds to a designated service provider and grantee of a community early childhood council. These standards shall include requirements relating to:

The financial management of funds paid to grantees;

The maintenance of records; and

An independent audit of the use of grant funds.

The council may disband or suspend a community early childhood council, and may remove one (1) or more members for nonperformance or malfeasance. The council may also recover funds that have been determined by the council to have been misappropriated or misspent in relation to a grant award.

An appeal to the council may be made by a community early childhood council as to a decision made by the council on the disbanding or suspension of a community early childhood council, service provider, or grantee on a determination that funds have been misappropriated or misspent and are subject to recovery. The appeal shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The council, community early childhood councils established by the council, and initiatives funded by the council with expenditures from the early childhood development fund shall expire when:

Funds are no longer designated to the Commonwealth from the master settlement agreement signed on November 22, 1998, between the participating tobacco manufacturers and the forty (40) settling states or related federal legislation; or

Funds are no longer designated to the early childhood development fund from gifts, grants, or federal funds to fund the council, the community early childhood councils established by the council, or any programs that had been funded by the council with expenditures from the early childhood development fund.

The council shall develop a request for proposal process by which local early childhood councils may request any funding appropriated to the council for use by the councils.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 308, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 127, § 7, effective March 18, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 50, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 120, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 62, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 57, § 7, effective June 25, 2013.

200.705.
Duties of Department of Education to early childhood entities.

The Department of Education shall provide staffing and administrative support to:

The Early Childhood Advisory Council;

The Early Childhood Professional Development Council; and

The Kentucky Early Intervention System Interagency Coordinating Council.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 308, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 121, effective July 12, 2006.

200.707.
Community early childhood councils.

The Early Childhood Advisory Council may recognize and fund a community early childhood council. A council shall be composed of no fewer than seven (7) and no more than twenty-seven (27) members. Each council shall be composed of at least one (1) member representing local agencies or organizations from profit, nonprofit, or family child care, Head Start or Early Head Start, and each school district in its designated service area. Other members may be appointed who represent local agencies and organizations, including, but not limited to, the organizations or agencies listed:

Early childhood advocate;

Faith community;

Family resource center;

Military establishment;

Child-care resource and referral agency or child-care subsidy agent;

Child-care consumer or parent;

County cooperative extension service;

Department for public health;

University, college, or technical school;

United Way;

Kentucky Early Intervention System;

Agency administering services to children with disabilities;

Home visitation agency;

Family literacy agency;

Civic organization;

Public library;

Regional training center;

Community action agency;

Government;

Business community;

Home schooling association;

Health care professional;

Foster care parent; or

Adoptive parent.

Members shall serve on a community early childhood council on a voluntary basis and receive no compensation or expense reimbursement for their service.

Members shall serve for a term of two (2) years and until their successors are appointed, except that for those members initially appointed, the terms shall be as follows:
(3) (a)

Members shall serve for a term of two (2) years and until their successors are appointed, except that for those members initially appointed, the terms shall be as follows:

One-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for three (3) years;

One-third (1/3) shall be appointed for two (2) years; and

One-third (1/3) shall be appointed for one (1) year.

Vacancies shall be appointed for unexpired terms in the same manner as original appointments.

A community early childhood council shall collaborate with the District Early Intervention Committee, the Preschool Interagency Planning Council, and other existing interagency groups in the service area.

A community early childhood council may apply for a competitive grant from the Early Childhood Advisory Council, consistent with a state plan for grant participation as established by the Early Childhood Advisory Council. Grant proposals shall:

Include a needs assessment and budget proposal for the respective service area served by a community early childhood council;

Not include administrative costs that exceed five percent (5%); and

Contain a signed statement from each member of the community early childhood council certifying that no program, agency, or individual that may receive part of an award would constitute a conflict of interest under KRS Chapter 11A for the council member. Issues concerning conflicts of interest shall be submitted to the Executive Branch Ethics Commission for resolution.

A community early childhood council shall submit an annual report to the Early Childhood Advisory Council that details the activities and services of the community early childhood council, including the progress that the community early childhood council has made toward addressing the early childhood development and school readiness goals for its designated service area and recommendations that may be included in the state plan.

Any records that are in the custody of a community early childhood council, a designated service provider, or a grantee that contain personal and identifying information relating to a family or children receiving services through the council shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure, except as otherwise authorized by law.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 308, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 57, § 8, effective June 25, 2013.

200.709.
Early Childhood Business Council. [Repealed.]

200.711.
Early Childhood Professional Development Council. [Repealed.]